Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1665XC (4) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.186, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. The department may waive the 3 requirement that an applicant actually demonstrate the ability 4 to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of 5 a motor vehicle and other physical or mental examinations for 6 an applicant who is on active duty in the military service, or 7 who has separated from such service in the past year, and who 8 certifies that during the two-year period immediately preceding 9 the application for a driverâs license, all of the following 10 are true: 11 (1) The applicant has not had a driverâs license, other than 12 a military license. 13 (2) The applicant has maintained a clear driving record. 14 For purposes of this subparagraph, âclear driving recordâ 15 means the individual has not been identified as a candidate 16 for suspension or revocation of a driverâs license under the 17 habitual violator or habitual offender provisions of the 18 departmentâs regulations; is not subject to a driverâs license 19 suspension, revocation, denial, cancellation, disqualification, 20 or bar; and has no record of a conviction for a moving traffic 21 violation determined to be the cause of a motor vehicle 22 accident. 23 b. An applicant for a waiver under this subsection must 24 certify and provide evidence as required by the department that 25 all of the following apply: 26 (1) The applicant is regularly employed or was regularly 27 employed within the past year in a military position requiring 28 operation of a motor vehicle. 29 (2) The applicant was operating a motor vehicle 30 representative of the class of motor vehicle the applicant 31 expects to operate for at least two years immediately preceding 32 honorable separation from military service as evidenced by the 33 personâs certificate of release or discharge from active duty, 34 commonly referred to as a DD214. 35 -1- LSB 1665XC (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ c. An applicant who obtains a waiver under this subsection 1 shall successfully complete a screening of the applicantâs 2 eyesight, a test of the applicantâs ability to read and 3 understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing 4 traffic, and a test of the applicantâs knowledge of the 5 traffic laws of this state, as required under subsection 2. An 6 applicant who obtains a waiver under this subsection is exempt 7 from the driver education requirements under section 321.178. 8